Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1894.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 5, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 2. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 27, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later, except that paragraph (b) is effective the day following final enactment. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 3. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 30, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. The amendment to clause (5), item (ii), the amendment to clause (14), and the amendment striking clause (18) are effective January 1, 2024, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The amendment to clause (4) is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 4. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 32, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 5. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 47, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. This section is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 6. Laws 2023, chapter 61, article 1, section 85, the effective date, is amended to read: EFFECTIVE DATE. Paragraph (a) is effective January 1, 2024, or upon federal approval, whichever is later, and paragraph (b) is effective January 1, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2029new text end , or upon federal approval, whichever is later. The commissioner of human services shall notify the revisor of statutes when federal approval is obtained. Sec. 7. new text begin ADVISORY TASK FORCE ON FAMILY RESIDENTIAL SERVICES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment; purpose. new text end new text begin The Advisory Task Force on Family Residential Services is established to evaluate proposed family residential services rate modifications and the impact any proposed payment methodology would have on existing family residential services and licensed adult family foster care providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The Advisory Task Force on Family Residential Services must consist of the members appointed as follows: new text end new text begin (1) two licensed adult family foster care providers, appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (2) two licensed adult family foster care providers, appointed by ARRM; new text end new text begin (3) one member representing the Department of Human Services who has experience with adult family foster care providers and family residential services, appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (4) one member representing the Department of Human Services who has experience with disability waiver rate setting, appointed by the commissioner of human services; new text end new text begin (5) one member representing lead agencies, appointed by the Association of Minnesota Counties; new text end new text begin (6) one member representing ARRM, appointed by ARRM; new text end new text begin (7) one member receiving services through adult family foster care, appointed by the commissioner of human services; and new text end new text begin (8) one member receiving life sharing services, appointed by the commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6, member compensation and reimbursement for expenses are governed by Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must convene the first meeting of the advisory task force no later than March 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) Advisory task force meetings are subject to the open meeting law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin (c) Advisory task force meetings must be conducted by telephone or interactive technology according to Minnesota Statutes, section 13D.015. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administrative support. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services must provide administrative support and staff assistance for the advisory task force. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of human services must provide the advisory task force with data, fiscal estimates, rate models, draft waiver amendments, implementation updates, estimated impacts, and other information the advisory task force requires to fulfill its duties under subdivisions 5 and 6. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) Prior to issuing the report required under subdivision 6, paragraph (a), the advisory task force must evaluate multiple family residential service rate models and the impact the proposed rate models would have on family residential services and adult family foster care providers. The evaluations must include: new text end new text begin (1) case studies demonstrating rate changes adult family foster care providers will experience under each rate model; new text end new text begin (2) an estimate of the median rate change for family residential services adult family foster care providers will experience under each rate model; new text end new text begin (3) the number of adult family foster care providers operating in Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (4) the number of individuals receiving family residential services from licensed adult family foster care providers. new text end new text begin (b) Prior to issuing the report required under subdivision 6, paragraph (b), the advisory task force must monitor the development and implementation of the family residential service rate methodology and the impact of the rate methodology on family residential services and adult family foster care providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) No later than August 1, 2027, the advisory task force must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over licensed adult foster care providers and family residential services reimbursement rates a written report that includes recommendations on: new text end new text begin (1) a payment rate methodology for family residential services; new text end new text begin (2) a payment rate methodology for life sharing services; new text end new text begin (3) any additional recommended changes to family residential services and life sharing services; new text end new text begin (4) any legislative changes required to implement the recommendations of the advisory task force; and new text end new text begin (5) any legislative modifications to the duties or authorities of the advisory task force required to adequately monitor the implementation of new rates for family residential services and life sharing services. new text end new text begin (b) No later than January 15, 2030, the advisory task force must submit to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over licensed adult foster care providers and family residential services reimbursement rates a written report that includes an assessment of the development and implementation of the family residential service rate methodology and the impact of the rate methodology on family residential services and adult family foster care providers. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The advisory task force expires June 30, 2030. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ADVISORY TASK FORCE ON FAMILY RESIDENTIAL SERVICES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the Advisory Task Force on Family Residential Services. The general fund base for the Advisory Task Force on Family Residential Services is $....... in fiscal year 2028, $....... in fiscal year 2029, and $0 in fiscal year 2030. new text end